New York, session 2025-2026, S10166.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. The legislature hereby finds and 2 declares that the enactment of these appropriations provides sufficient 3 authority to the comptroller for the purpose of making payments for the 4 purposes described herein until such time as appropriation bills submit- 5 ted by the governor pursuant to article VII of the state constitution 6 for the support of government for the state fiscal year beginning April 7 1, 2026 are enacted. 8 § 2. Section 2 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 9 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 108 10 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 § 2. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 12 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 13 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 14 public officers and for the purpose specified, which amount shall be 15 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 16 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 17 For the purpose of making payments for 18 personal service, including liabilities 19 incurred prior to April 1, 2026, on the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12037-01-6 S. 10166 2 1 payrolls scheduled to be paid during the 2 period April 1 through May [4] 6, 2026 to 3 state officers and employees of the execu- 4 tive branch, including the governor, lieu- 5 tenant governor, comptroller, and attorney 6 general, and to employees of the legisla- 7 ture. This appropriation also includes 8 payments for services performed by mental- 9 ly ill or developmentally disabled persons 10 who are employed in state-operated special 11 employment, work-for-pay or sheltered 12 workshop programs ........................ 13 .......................... [1,491,046,469] 1,799,296,469 14 -------------- 15 § 3. Section 3 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 16 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 108 17 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 § 3. The amount specified in this section, or so much thereof as shall 19 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose designated, is hereby appropri- 20 ated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the public 21 officers and for the purpose specified, which amount shall be available 22 for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 23 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 24 For the payment of state operations non 25 personal service liabilities to the execu- 26 tive branch, including the comptroller, 27 and the attorney general, and legislature, 28 incurred in the ordinary course of busi- 29 ness, during the period April 1 through 30 May [4] 6, 2026, pursuant to existing 31 state law and for purposes for which the 32 legislature authorized the expenditure of 33 moneys during the 2025-2026 state fiscal 34 year; provided, however, that nothing 35 contained herein shall be deemed to limit 36 or restrict the power or authority of 37 state departments or agencies to conduct 38 their activities or operations in accord- 39 ance with existing law, and further 40 provided that nothing contained herein 41 shall be deemed to supersede, nullify or 42 modify the provisions of section 40 of the 43 state finance law prescribing when appro- 44 priations made for the 2025-2026 state 45 fiscal year shall have ceased to have 46 force and effect ............. [44,000,000] 56,000,000 47 -------------- 48 § 4. Section 4 of chapter 102 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 49 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 108 50 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 51 § 4. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 52 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby S. 10166 3 1 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 2 respective public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount 3 shall be available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 4 MISCELLANEOUS - - ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 5 The sum of ten million dollars 6 ($10,000,000), or so much thereof as shall 7 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose 8 designated, is hereby appropriated for 9 contracts and grants approved for purposes 10 for which the legislature authorized the 11 expenditures of money during the 2025-2026 12 fiscal year. An amount up to ten million 13 dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available 14 for the payment of capital projects 15 liabilities incurred during the period 16 from April 1 through May [4] 6, 2026 for 17 contracts and grants approved prior to 18 April 1, 2026, provided, however, that 19 nothing contained herein shall be deemed 20 to limit or restrict the power or authori- 21 ty of state departments or agencies to 22 conduct their activities or operations in 23 accordance with existing law, and further 24 provided that nothing contained herein 25 shall be deemed to supersede, nullify, or 26 modify the provisions of section 40 of the 27 state finance law prescribing when appro- 28 priations made for the 2025-2026 fiscal 29 year shall have ceased to have force and 30 effect ...................................... 10,000,000 31 -------------- 32 § 5. Section 5 of chapter 102 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 33 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 108 34 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 36 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 37 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 38 respective public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount 39 shall be available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 40 MISCELLANEOUS - - ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 41 The sum of twenty million dollars 42 ($20,000,000), or so much thereof as shall 43 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose 44 designated, is hereby appropriated for 45 contracts and grants approved for purposes 46 for which the legislature authorized the 47 expenditures of money during the 2025-2026 48 fiscal year. An amount up to twenty 49 million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be 50 available for the payment of capital 51 projects liabilities incurred during the S. 10166 4 1 period from April 1 through May [4] 6, 2 2026 for contracts and grants approved 3 after April 1, 2026, provided, however, 4 that nothing contained herein shall be 5 deemed to limit or restrict the power or 6 authority of state departments or agencies 7 to conduct their activities or operations 8 in accordance with existing law, and 9 further provided that nothing contained 10 herein shall be deemed to supersede, 11 nullify, or modify the provisions of 12 section 40 of the state finance law 13 prescribing when appropriations made for 14 the 2025-2026 fiscal year shall have 15 ceased to have force and effect ............ 20,000,000 16 -------------- 17 § 6. Section 4 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 18 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 108 19 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 § 4. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 21 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 22 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 23 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 24 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 25 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 26 GENERAL STATE CHARGES 27 STATE OPERATIONS 28 GENERAL STATE CHARGES ....................... [713,806,000] 748,383,000 29 -------------- 30 General Fund 31 State Purposes Account - 10050 32 For employee fringe benefits according to 33 the following project schedule including 34 those benefits which are related to 35 employees paid from funds, accounts, or 36 programs where the division of the budget 37 has issued waivers (85022) .. [705,908,000] 740,485,000 38 Project Schedule 39 PROJECT AMOUNT 40 -------------------------------------------- 41 For the state's contribution 42 to the health insurance fund 43 and deposit into the retiree 44 health benefit trust fund 45 pursuant to section 99-aa of 46 the state finance law. The 47 state's share of the health 48 insurance program dividends S. 10166 5 1 shall be available to pay 2 for the premiums in 2026-27 .. 514,422,000 3 For the state's contribution 4 to the social security 5 contribution fund .......... 6 ............... [137,500,000] 171,000,000 7 For the state's contribution 8 to employee benefit fund 9 programs ...................... 40,500,000 10 For the state's contribution 11 to the dental insurance plan ... 7,415,000 12 For the payment of the metro- 13 politan commuter transporta- 14 tion mobility tax pursuant 15 to article 23 of the tax 16 law, as added by chapter 25 17 of the laws of 2009, on 18 behalf of the state employ- 19 ees employed in the metro- 20 politan commuter transporta- 21 tion district .................. 5,345,000 22 For the state's share of 23 contributions to the volun- 24 tary defined contribution 25 plan made on behalf of 26 eligible employees pursuant 27 to chapter 18 of the laws 28 of 2012 who elect to partic- 29 ipate in such plan and who 30 are not otherwise eligi- 31 ble to participate in the 32 SUNY optional retirement 33 program ........... [709,000] 1,059,000 34 For the state's contribution 35 to the vision care plan .... 36 .................... [17,000] 744,000 37 -------------- 38 Project schedule total ... 39 ........... [705,908,000] 740,485,000 40 -------------- 41 For payments in accordance with section 19-a 42 of the public lands law (80567) .............. 7,720,000 43 For payment of claims for damage to personal 44 or real property or for bodily injuries or 45 wrongful death caused by officers, employ- 46 ees, or other authorized persons providing 47 service to state government while provid- 48 ing such service, and the state university 49 construction fund while acting within the 50 scope of their employment, and while oper- 51 ating motor vehicles, and for any individ- 52 uals operating motor vehicles which are 53 assigned on a permanent basis with unre- 54 stricted use to state officers and employ- S. 10166 6 1 ees when the person is permanently 2 assigned the motor vehicle (80559) ............. 178,000 3 -------------- 4 § 7. Section 5 of chapter 100 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 5 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 108 6 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 8 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 9 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 10 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 11 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 12 JUDICIARY 13 For the purpose of making payments for 14 personal service, including liabilities 15 incurred prior to April 1, 2026, on the 16 payrolls scheduled to be paid during the 17 period April 1 through May [4] 6, 2026 to 18 officers and employees of the judiciary .. 19 ............................. [186,000,000] 269,000,000 20 For the payment of state operations nonper- 21 sonal service liabilities, the sum of 22 [twenty-five million dollars 23 ($25,000,000)] thirty-six million dollars 24 ($36,000,000), or so much thereof as shall 25 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose 26 designated, is hereby appropriated to the 27 judiciary out of any moneys in the general 28 fund or other funds to the credit of the 29 state purposes account not otherwise 30 appropriated. The comptroller is hereby 31 authorized and directed to utilize this 32 appropriation for the purpose of making 33 payments for nonpersonal service liabil- 34 ities incurred by the judiciary from April 35 1 through May [4] 6, 2026 .... [25,000,000] 36,000,000 36 For the payment of aid to localities liabil- 37 ities, the sum of [eleven million dollars 38 ($11,000,000)] twenty-two million dollars 39 ($22,000,000), or so much thereof as shall 40 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose 41 designated, is hereby appropriated to the 42 judiciary out of any moneys in the general 43 fund or other funds to the credit of the 44 state purposes account not otherwise 45 appropriated. The comptroller is hereby 46 authorized and directed to utilize this 47 appropriation for the purpose of making 48 payments for aid to localities liabilities 49 incurred by the judiciary from April 1 50 through May [4] 6, 2026 ...... [11,000,000] 22,000,000 51 For the payment of employee fringe benefit 52 programs including, but not limited to, 53 the judiciary's contributions to the S. 10166 7 1 health insurance fund, the employees' 2 retirement system pension accumulation 3 fund, the social security contribution 4 fund, employee benefit fund programs, the 5 dental insurance plan, the vision care 6 plan, the unemployment insurance fund, and 7 for workers' compensation benefits, the 8 sum of [sixty-two million two hundred 9 fifty thousand dollars ($62,250,000)] one 10 hundred fifteen million seven hundred 11 fifty thousand dollars ($115,750,000), or 12 so much thereof as shall be sufficient to 13 accomplish the purpose designated, is 14 hereby appropriated to the judiciary out 15 of any moneys in the general fund or other 16 funds to the credit of the state purposes 17 account not otherwise appropriated. The 18 comptroller is hereby authorized and 19 directed to utilize this appropriation for 20 the purpose of making payments for employ- 21 ee fringe benefit liabilities incurred by 22 the judiciary from April 1 through May [4] 23 6, 2026 ...................... [62,250,000] 115,750,000 24 -------------- 25 § 8. Section 5 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 26 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 108 27 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 29 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 30 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 31 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 32 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 33 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 34 AID TO LOCALITIES 35 CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH PROGRAM .......... [45,372,000] 48,582,000 36 -------------- 37 General Fund 38 Local Assistance Account - 10000 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 Indian health program pursuant to a plan 41 prepared by the commissioner of health and 42 approved by the director of the budget. 43 The moneys hereby appropriated shall be 44 for payment of financial assistance here- 45 tofore accrued or hereafter to accrue 46 (26840) ..................................... 10,062,000 47 -------------- 48 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 49 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund S. 10166 8 1 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022 2 For various federal food and nutritional 3 services. The moneys hereby appropriated 4 shall be available for payment of finan- 5 cial assistance heretofore accrued (26986) 6 .............................. [35,310,000] 38,520,000 7 -------------- 8 CHILD HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM ............................. 212,950,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 HCRA Resources Fund 12 Children's Health Insurance Account - 20810 13 The money hereby appropriated is available 14 for payment of aid heretofore accrued or 15 hereafter accrued. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 17 the money hereby appropriated may be 18 increased or decreased by transfer or 19 suballocation to appropriations of the 20 office of temporary and disability assist- 21 ance, for the reimbursement of local 22 district administrative costs related to 23 children newly enrolled in medicaid whose 24 household income is between 100 percent 25 and 133 percent of the federal poverty 26 level. 27 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 28 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 29 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 30 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 31 and/or disallowances. 32 For services and expenses related to the 33 children's health insurance program 34 authorized pursuant to title 1-A of arti- 35 cle 25 of the public health law (26931) .... 212,950,000 36 -------------- 37 ELDERLY PHARMACEUTICAL INSURANCE COVERAGE PROGRAM ............ 1,800,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 HCRA Resources Fund 41 EPIC Premium Account - 20818 42 For services and expenses of the program for 43 elderly pharmaceutical insurance coverage, 44 including reimbursement to pharmacies 45 participating in such program. The moneys 46 hereby appropriated shall be available for 47 payment of financial assistance heretofore 48 accrued (26803) .............................. 1,800,000 49 -------------- S. 10166 9 1 ESSENTIAL PLAN PROGRAM ................................... 1,150,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 4 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 5 Essential Plan Account - 25186 6 For services and expenses related to the 7 essential plan program, in accordance 8 State Innovation Waiver provisions author- 9 ized by Section 1332 of the federal 10 patient protection and affordable care 11 act. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 13 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 14 be increased or decreased by interchange 15 or transfer with any appropriation of the 16 department of health or for transfer to 17 Health Research Incorporated (HRI). 18 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 19 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 20 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 21 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 22 and/or disallowances. 23 The money hereby appropriated is available 24 for payment of aid heretofore accrued or 25 hereafter accrued (59054) ................ 1,150,000,000 26 -------------- 27 MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM .............. [8,449,731,000] 10,409,681,000 28 -------------- 29 General Fund 30 Local Assistance Account - 10000 31 For the medical assistance program, includ- 32 ing administrative expenses, for local 33 social services districts, and for medical 34 care rates for authorized child care agen- 35 cies. 36 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state 37 finance law or any provision of law to the 38 contrary, subject to federal approval, 39 department of health state funds medicaid 40 spending, excluding payments for medical 41 services provided at state facilities 42 operated by the office of mental health, 43 the office for people with developmental 44 disabilities and the office of addiction 45 services and supports and further exclud- 46 ing any payments which are not appropri- 47 ated within the department of health, in 48 the aggregate, for the period April 1, 49 2026 through March 31, 2027, shall not 50 exceed $36,099,200,000 except as provided 51 below provided, however, such aggregate S. 10166 10 1 limits may be adjusted by the director of 2 the budget to account for any changes in 3 the New York state federal medical assist- 4 ance percentage amount established pursu- 5 ant to the federal social security act, 6 increases in provider revenues, reductions 7 in local social services district payments 8 for medical assistance administration, 9 minimum wage increases, and beginning 10 April 1, 2012 the operational costs of the 11 New York state medical indemnity fund, 12 pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 13 2011, and state costs or savings from the 14 essential plan program. Such projections 15 may be adjusted by the director of the 16 budget to account for increased or expe- 17 dited department of health state funds 18 medicaid expenditures as a result of a 19 natural or other type of disaster, includ- 20 ing a governmental declaration of emergen- 21 cy. 22 The director of the budget, in consultation 23 with the commissioner of health, shall 24 assess on a quarterly basis known and 25 projected medicaid expenditures by catego- 26 ry of service and by geographic region, as 27 defined by the commissioner, incurred both 28 prior to and subsequent to such assessment 29 for each such period, and if the director 30 of the budget determines that such expend- 31 itures are expected to cause medicaid 32 spending for such period to exceed the 33 aggregate limit specified herein for such 34 period, the state medicaid director, in 35 consultation with the director of the 36 budget and the commissioner of health, 37 shall develop a medicaid savings allo- 38 cation adjustment to limit such spending 39 to the aggregate limit specified herein 40 for such period. 41 Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment 42 shall be designed, to reduce the expendi- 43 tures authorized by the appropriations 44 herein in compliance with the following 45 guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made 46 in compliance with applicable federal law, 47 including the provisions of the Patient 48 Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public 49 Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and 50 Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, 51 Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively 52 "Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent 53 amendments thereto or regulations promul- 54 gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be 55 made in a manner that complies with the 56 state medicaid plan approved by the feder- S. 10166 11 1 al centers for medicare and medicaid 2 services, provided, however, that the 3 commissioner of health is authorized to 4 submit any state plan amendment or seek 5 other federal approval, including waiver 6 authority, to implement the provisions of 7 the medicaid savings allocation adjustment 8 that meets the other criteria set forth 9 herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a 10 manner that maximizes federal financial 11 participation, to the extent practicable, 12 including any federal financial partic- 13 ipation that is available or is reasonably 14 expected to become available, in the 15 discretion of the commissioner, under the 16 Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall 17 be made uniformly among categories of 18 services and geographic regions of the 19 state, to the extent practicable, and 20 shall be made uniformly within a category 21 of service, to the extent practicable, 22 except where the commissioner determines 23 that there are sufficient grounds for 24 non-uniformity, including but not limited 25 to: the extent to which specific catego- 26 ries of services contributed to department 27 of health medicaid state funds spending in 28 excess of the limits specified herein; the 29 need to maintain safety net services in 30 underserved communities; or the potential 31 benefits of pursuing innovative payment 32 models contemplated by the Affordable Care 33 Act, in which case such grounds shall be 34 set forth in the medicaid savings allo- 35 cation adjustment; and (5) reductions 36 shall be made in a manner that does not 37 unnecessarily create administrative 38 burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi- 39 ents or providers. 40 The commissioner shall seek the input of the 41 legislature, as well as organizations 42 representing health care providers, 43 consumers, businesses, workers, health 44 insurers, and others with relevant exper- 45 tise, in developing such medicaid savings 46 allocation adjustment, to the extent that 47 all or part of such adjustment, in the 48 discretion of the commissioner, is likely 49 to have a material impact on the overall 50 medicaid program, particular categories of 51 service or particular geographic regions 52 of the state. 53 (a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid 54 savings allocation adjustment on the 55 department of health's website and shall 56 provide written copies of such adjustment S. 10166 12 1 to the chairs of the senate finance and 2 the assembly ways and means committees at 3 least 30 days before the date on which 4 implementation is expected to begin. 5 (b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid 6 savings allocation adjustment subsequent 7 to the provisions of notice and prior to 8 implementation but needs to provide a new 9 notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of 10 this paragraph only if the commissioner 11 determines, in his or her discretion, that 12 such revisions materially alter the 13 adjustment. 14 Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs 15 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, the 16 commissioner need not seek the input 17 described in paragraph (a) of this subdi- 18 vision or provide notice pursuant to para- 19 graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the 20 discretion of the commissioner, expedited 21 development and implementation of a medi- 22 caid savings allocation adjustment is 23 necessary due to a public health emergen- 24 cy. 25 For purposes of this section, a public 26 health emergency is defined as: (i) a 27 disaster, natural or otherwise, that 28 significantly increases the immediate need 29 for health care personnel in an area of 30 the state; (ii) an event or condition that 31 creates a widespread risk of exposure to a 32 serious communicable disease, or the 33 potential for such widespread risk of 34 exposure; or (iii) any other event or 35 condition determined by the commissioner 36 to constitute an imminent threat to public 37 health. 38 Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to 39 prevent all or part of such medicaid 40 savings allocation adjustment from taking 41 effect retroactively to the extent permit- 42 ted by the federal centers for medicare 43 and medicaid services. 44 In accordance with the medicaid savings 45 allocation adjustment, the commissioner of 46 the department of health shall reduce 47 department of health state funds medicaid 48 spending by the amount of the projected 49 overspending through, actions including, 50 but not limited to modifying or suspending 51 reimbursement methods, including but not 52 limited to all fees, premium levels and 53 rates of payment, notwithstanding any 54 provision of law that sets a specific 55 amount or methodology for any such 56 payments or rates of payment; modifying or S. 10166 13 1 discontinuing medicaid program benefits; 2 seeking all necessary federal approvals, 3 including, but not limited to waivers, 4 waiver amendments; and suspending time 5 frames for notice, approval or certif- 6 ication of rate requirements, notwith- 7 standing any provision of law, rule or 8 regulation to the contrary, including but 9 not limited to sections 2807 and 3614 of 10 the public health law, section 18 of chap- 11 ter 2 of the laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 12 505.14(h). 13 The department of health shall prepare a 14 quarterly report that sets forth: (a) 15 known and projected department of health 16 medicaid expenditures as described in 17 subdivision (1) of this section, and 18 factors that could result in medicaid 19 disbursements for the relevant state 20 fiscal year to exceed the projected 21 department of health state funds disburse- 22 ments in the enacted budget financial plan 23 pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 23 of 24 the state finance law, including spending 25 increases or decreases due to: enrollment 26 fluctuations, rate changes, utilization 27 changes, MRT investments, and shift of 28 beneficiaries to managed care; and vari- 29 ations in offline medicaid payments; and 30 (b) the actions taken to implement any 31 medicaid savings allocation adjustment 32 implemented pursuant to subdivision (4) of 33 this section, including information 34 concerning the impact of such actions on 35 each category of service and each 36 geographic region of the state. Each such 37 quarterly report shall be provided to the 38 chairs of the senate finance and the 39 assembly ways and means committees and 40 shall be posted on the department of 41 health's website in a timely manner. 42 The money hereby appropriated is to be 43 available for payment of aid heretofore 44 accrued or hereafter accrued to munici- 45 palities, and to providers of medical 46 services pursuant to section 367-b of the 47 social services law, and for payment of 48 state aid to municipalities and to provid- 49 ers of family care where payment systems 50 through the fiscal intermediaries are not 51 operational. 52 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 53 of law to the contrary, funds may be used 54 by the department for outside legal 55 assistance on issues involving the federal 56 government, the conduct of preadmission S. 10166 14 1 screening and annual resident reviews 2 required by the state's medicaid program, 3 computer matching with insurance carriers 4 to insure that medicaid is the payer of 5 last resort and activities related to the 6 management of the pharmacy benefit avail- 7 able under the medicaid program. 8 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 9 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 10 the social services law, or payments of 11 federal funds otherwise due to the local 12 social services districts for programs 13 provided under the federal social security 14 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 15 herein appropriated, in amounts certified 16 by the state commissioner of temporary and 17 disability assistance or the state commis- 18 sioner of health as due from local social 19 services districts each month as their 20 share of payments made pursuant to section 21 367-b of the social services law may be 22 set aside by the state comptroller in an 23 interest-bearing account in order to 24 ensure the orderly and prompt payment of 25 providers under section 367-b of the 26 social services law pursuant to an esti- 27 mate provided by the commissioner of 28 health of each local social services 29 district's share of payments made pursuant 30 to section 367-b of the social services 31 law. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 33 of law, funding made available by these 34 appropriations shall support direct salary 35 costs and related fringe benefits within 36 the medical assistance program associated 37 with any minimum wage increase that takes 38 effect during the timeframe of these 39 appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of 40 the labor law. Each eligible organization 41 in receipt of funding made available by 42 these appropriations may be required to 43 submit written certification, in such form 44 and at such time the commissioner may 45 prescribe, attesting to the total amount 46 of funds used by the eligible organiza- 47 tion, how such funding will be or was used 48 for purposes eligible under these appro- 49 priations and any other reporting deemed 50 necessary by the commissioner. The amounts 51 appropriated herein may include advances 52 to organizations authorized to receive 53 such funds to accomplish this purpose. 54 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 55 the money hereby appropriated may be 56 increased or decreased by interchange or S. 10166 15 1 transfer, with any appropriation of the 2 department of health and the office of 3 medicaid inspector general and may be 4 increased or decreased by transfer or 5 suballocation between these appropriated 6 amounts and appropriations of the depart- 7 ment of health state purpose account, the 8 office of mental health, office for people 9 with developmental disabilities, the 10 office of addiction services and supports, 11 the department of family assistance office 12 of temporary and disability assistance, 13 the department of corrections and communi- 14 ty supervision, the office of information 15 technology services, the state university 16 of New York, and office of children and 17 family services, the office of medicaid 18 inspector general, the state education 19 department, and the state office for the 20 aging with the approval of the director of 21 the budget, who shall file such approval 22 with the department of audit and control 23 and copies thereof with the chairman of 24 the senate finance committee and the 25 chairman of the assembly ways and means 26 committee. 27 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 28 of law to the contrary, the moneys hereby 29 appropriated may be used for payments to 30 the centers for medicaid and medicare 31 services for obligations incurred related 32 to the pharmaceutical costs of dually 33 eligible medicare/medicaid beneficiaries 34 participating in the medicare drug benefit 35 authorized by P.L. 108-173. 36 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 37 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated 38 shall not be used for any existing rates, 39 fees, fee schedule, or procedures which 40 may affect the cost of care and services 41 provided by personal care providers, case 42 managers, health maintenance organiza- 43 tions, out of state medical facilities 44 which provide care and services to resi- 45 dents of the state, providers of transpor- 46 tation services, that are altered, 47 amended, adjusted or otherwise changed by 48 a local social services district unless 49 previously approved by the department of 50 health and the director of the budget. 51 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 52 of law to the contrary, funds shall be 53 made available to the commissioner of the 54 office of mental health or the commission- 55 er of the office of addiction services and 56 supports, in consultation with the commis- S. 10166 16 1 sioner of health and approved by the 2 director of the budget, and consistent 3 with appropriations made therefor, to 4 implement allocation adjustment developed 5 by each such commissioner which shall 6 describe mental health or substance use 7 disorder services that should be developed 8 to meet service needs resulting from the 9 reduction of inpatient behavioral health 10 services provided under the medicaid 11 program, by programs licensed pursuant to 12 article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene 13 law. Such programs may include programs 14 that are licensed pursuant to both article 15 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 16 28 of the public health law, or certified 17 under both article 32 of the mental 18 hygiene law and article 28 of the public 19 health law. 20 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 21 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 22 be available for payments associated with 23 the resolution by settlement agreement or 24 judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation 25 where the department of health is a party. 26 For services and expenses of the medical 27 assistance program including hospital 28 inpatient services and general hospitals 29 that are safety-net providers that evince 30 severe financial distress, pursuant to 31 criteria determined by the commissioner, 32 shall be eligible for awards for amounts 33 appropriated herein, to enable such 34 providers to maintain operations and vital 35 services while establishing long term 36 solutions to achieve sustainable health 37 services. 38 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions 39 of law, no expenditures shall be used for 40 the medical assistance program for any 41 expenses not explicitly authorized in law 42 without the approval of the director of 43 the budget. 44 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 45 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 46 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 47 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 48 reappropriation for this item covering 49 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 50 ation for this item covering fiscal year 51 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 52 laws of 2025 (26947) ........ [121,190,000] 145,428,000 53 For services and expenses of the medical 54 assistance program including hospital 55 outpatient and emergency room services. S. 10166 17 1 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 2 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 3 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 4 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 5 reappropriation for this item covering 6 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 7 ation for this item covering fiscal year 8 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 9 laws of 2025 (26948) ......... [36,245,000] 43,494,000 10 For services and expenses of the medical 11 assistance program including clinic 12 services. 13 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 14 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 15 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 16 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 17 reappropriation for this item covering 18 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 19 ation for this item covering fiscal year 20 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 21 laws of 2025 (26949) ......... [70,990,000] 85,188,000 22 For services and expenses of the medical 23 assistance program including nursing home 24 services. 25 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 26 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 27 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 28 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 29 reappropriation for this item covering 30 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 31 ation for this item covering fiscal year 32 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 33 laws of 2025 (26950) ........ [178,425,000] 214,110,000 34 For services and expenses of the medical 35 assistance program including other long 36 term care services. 37 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 38 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 39 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 40 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 41 reappropriation for this item covering 42 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 43 ation for this item covering fiscal year 44 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 45 laws of 2025 (26951) ....... [849,930,000] 1,019,916,000 46 For services and expenses of the medical 47 assistance program including managed care 48 services including regional planning 49 activities of the finger lakes health 50 systems agency, including statewide coor- 51 dination and demonstration of best prac- 52 tices. The department shall make grants 53 within amounts appropriated therefor, to 54 assure high-quality and accessible primary 55 care, to provide technical assistance to 56 support financial and business planning S. 10166 18 1 for integrated systems of care, and to 2 assist primary care providers in the 3 adoption, implementation, and meaningful 4 use of electronic health record technolo- 5 gy. 6 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 7 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 8 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 9 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 10 reappropriation for this item covering 11 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 12 ation for this item covering fiscal year 13 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 14 laws of 2025 (26952) ........ [778,550,000] 934,260,000 15 For services and expenses for health homes 16 including grants to health homes. 17 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 18 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 19 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 20 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 21 reappropriation for this item covering 22 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 23 ation for this item covering fiscal year 24 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 25 laws of 2025 (29548) ......... [18,850,000] 22,620,000 26 For services and expenses of the medical 27 assistance program including pharmacy 28 services provided, however, that no funds 29 shall be made available pursuant to this 30 appropriation for any drug not explicitly 31 authorized in any enacted law, rule, or 32 regulation without approval from the 33 director of the budget. 34 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 35 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 36 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 37 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 38 reappropriation for this item covering 39 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 40 ation for this item covering fiscal year 41 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 42 laws of 2025 (26953) ........ [359,630,000] 431,556,000 43 For services and expenses of the medical 44 assistance program including transporta- 45 tion services. 46 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 47 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 48 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 49 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 50 reappropriation for this item covering 51 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 52 ation for this item covering fiscal year 53 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 54 laws of 2025 (26954) ......... [51,660,000] 61,992,000 S. 10166 19 1 For services and expenses of the medical 2 assistance program including dental 3 services. 4 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 5 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 6 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 7 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 8 reappropriation for this item covering 9 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 10 ation for this item covering fiscal year 11 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 12 laws of 2025 (26955) ............ [395,000] 474,000 13 For services and expenses of the medical 14 assistance program including non-institu- 15 tional and other spending. 16 The money hereby appropriated is available 17 for payment of liabilities heretofore 18 accrued or hereafter accrued. 19 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 20 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 21 be available for payments to any county or 22 public school districts associated with 23 additional claims for school supportive 24 health services. 25 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 26 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 27 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 28 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 29 reappropriation for this item covering 30 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 31 ation for this item covering fiscal year 32 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 33 laws of 2025 (26956) ........ [103,020,000] 123,624,000 34 For services and expenses of the medical 35 assistance program including medical 36 services provided at state facilities 37 operated by the office of mental health, 38 the office for people with developmental 39 disabilities and the office of addiction 40 services and supports. 41 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 42 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 43 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 44 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 45 reappropriation for this item covering 46 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 47 ation for this item covering fiscal year 48 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 49 laws of 2025 (26961) ........ [480,770,000] 576,924,000 50 -------------- 51 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 52 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 53 Medicaid Direct Account - 25106 S. 10166 20 1 For services and expenses for the medical 2 assistance program, including administra- 3 tive expenses for local social services 4 districts, pursuant to title XIX of the 5 federal social security act or its succes- 6 sor program. 7 The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 8 available for payment of aid heretofore 9 accrued or hereafter accrued to munici- 10 palities, and to providers of medical 11 services pursuant to section 367-b of the 12 social services law, and for payment of 13 state aid to municipalities and to provid- 14 ers of family care where payment systems 15 through the fiscal intermediaries are not 16 operational. 17 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 18 of law, funding made available by these 19 appropriations shall support direct salary 20 costs and related fringe benefits within 21 the medical assistance program associated 22 with any minimum wage increase that takes 23 effect during the timeframe of these 24 appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of 25 the labor law. Each eligible organization 26 in receipt of funding made available by 27 these appropriations may be required to 28 submit written certification, in such form 29 and at such time the commissioner may 30 prescribe, attesting to the total amount 31 of funds used by the eligible organiza- 32 tion, how such funding will be or was used 33 for purposes eligible under these appro- 34 priations and any other reporting deemed 35 necessary by the commissioner. The amounts 36 appropriated herein may include advances 37 to organizations authorized to receive 38 such funds to accomplish this purpose. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 40 the money hereby appropriated may be 41 increased or decreased by interchange or 42 transfer, with any appropriation of the 43 department of health and the office of 44 medicaid inspector general and may be 45 increased or decreased by transfer or 46 suballocation between these appropriated 47 amounts and appropriations of the office 48 of mental health, office for people with 49 developmental disabilities, the office of 50 addiction services and supports, the 51 department of family assistance office of 52 temporary and disability assistance, 53 office of children and family services, 54 the department of financial services, 55 department of corrections and community 56 supervision, the office of information S. 10166 21 1 technology services, the state university 2 of New York, the state education depart- 3 ment, and the state office for the aging 4 with the approval of the director of the 5 budget, who shall file such approval with 6 the department of audit and control and 7 copies thereof with the chairman of the 8 senate finance committee and the chairman 9 of the assembly ways and means committee. 10 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 11 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 12 the social services law, or payments of 13 federal funds otherwise due to the local 14 social services districts for programs 15 provided under the federal social security 16 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 17 herein appropriated, in amounts certified 18 by the state commissioner of temporary and 19 disability assistance or the state commis- 20 sioner of health as due from local social 21 services districts each month as their 22 share of payments made pursuant to section 23 367-b of the social services law may be 24 set aside by the state comptroller in an 25 interest-bearing account in order to 26 ensure the orderly and prompt payment of 27 providers under section 367-b of the 28 social services law pursuant to an esti- 29 mate provided by the commissioner of 30 health of each local social services 31 district's share of payments made pursuant 32 to section 367-b of the social services 33 law. 34 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 35 of law to the contrary, funds shall be 36 made available to the commissioner of the 37 office of mental health or the commission- 38 er of the office of addiction services and 39 supports, in consultation with the commis- 40 sioner of health and approved by the 41 director of the budget, and consistent 42 with appropriations made therefor, to 43 implement allocation adjustment developed 44 by each such commissioner which shall 45 describe mental health or substance use 46 disorder services that should be developed 47 to meet service needs resulting from the 48 reduction of inpatient behavioral health 49 services provided under the medicaid 50 program, by programs licensed pursuant to 51 article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene 52 law. Such programs may include programs 53 that are licensed pursuant to both article 54 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 55 28 of the public health law, or certified 56 under both article 32 of the mental S. 10166 22 1 hygiene law and article 28 of the public 2 health law. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 4 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 5 be available for payments associated with 6 the resolution by settlement agreement or 7 judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation 8 where the department of health is a party. 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions 10 of law, no expenditures shall be used for 11 the medical assistance program for any 12 expenses not explicitly authorized in law 13 without the approval of the director of 14 the budget. 15 For services and expenses of the medical 16 assistance program including hospital 17 inpatient services. 18 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 19 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 20 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 21 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 22 reappropriation for this item covering 23 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 24 ation for this item covering fiscal year 25 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 26 laws of 2025 (26947) ........ [303,540,000] 379,425,000 27 For services and expenses of the medical 28 assistance program including hospital 29 outpatient and emergency room services. 30 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 31 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 32 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 33 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 34 reappropriation for this item covering 35 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 36 ation for this item covering fiscal year 37 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 38 laws of 2025 (26948) ......... [54,096,000] 67,620,000 39 For services and expenses of the medical 40 assistance program including clinic 41 services. 42 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 43 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 44 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 45 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 46 reappropriation for this item covering 47 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 48 ation for this item covering fiscal year 49 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 50 laws of 2025 (26949) ......... [87,588,000] 109,485,000 51 For services and expenses of the medical 52 assistance program including nursing home 53 services. 54 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 55 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 56 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall S. 10166 23 1 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 2 reappropriation for this item covering 3 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 4 ation for this item covering fiscal year 5 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 6 laws of 2025 (26950) ........ [450,960,000] 563,700,000 7 For services and expenses of the medical 8 assistance program including other long 9 term care services. 10 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 11 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 12 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 13 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 14 reappropriation for this item covering 15 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 16 ation for this item covering fiscal year 17 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 18 laws of 2025 (26951) ..... [1,286,436,000] 1,608,045,000 19 For services and expenses of the medical 20 assistance program including managed care 21 services including regional planning 22 activities of the finger lakes health 23 systems agency, including statewide coor- 24 dination and demonstration of best prac- 25 tices. The department shall make grants 26 within amounts appropriated therefor, to 27 assure high-quality and accessible primary 28 care, to provide technical assistance to 29 support financial and business planning 30 for integrated systems of care, and to 31 assist primary care providers in the 32 adoption, implementation, and meaningful 33 use of electronic health record technolo- 34 gy. 35 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 36 of law, rule, or regulation to the contra- 37 ry, funds appropriated herein shall not be 38 subject to article 6 of the financial 39 services law. 40 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 41 of law, rule, or regulation to the contra- 42 ry, funds appropriated herein shall only 43 be made available for applied behavior 44 analysis services if such services are 45 recommended by a health care or mental 46 health care practitioner authorized under 47 title eight of the education law who has 48 been designated as an applied behavior 49 analysis center of excellence provider by 50 the commissioner of health. 51 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 52 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 53 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 54 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 55 reappropriation for this item covering S. 10166 24 1 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 2 ation for this item covering fiscal year 3 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 4 laws of 2025 (26952) ..... [1,569,872,000] 1,962,340,000 5 For services and expenses of the medical 6 assistance program including pharmacy 7 services, provided, however, that no funds 8 shall be made available pursuant to this 9 appropriation for any drug not explicitly 10 authorized in any heretofore enacted law, 11 rule, or regulation without approval from 12 the director of the budget. 13 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 14 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 15 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 16 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 17 reappropriation for this item covering 18 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 19 ation for this item covering fiscal year 20 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 21 laws of 2025 (26953) ........ [472,876,000] 591,095,000 22 For services and expenses of the medical 23 assistance program including transporta- 24 tion services. 25 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 26 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 27 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 28 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 29 reappropriation for this item covering 30 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 31 ation for this item covering fiscal year 32 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 33 laws of 2025 (26954) ......... [63,528,000] 79,410,000 34 For services and expenses of the medical 35 assistance program including dental 36 services. 37 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 38 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 39 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 40 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 41 reappropriation for this item covering 42 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 43 ation for this item covering fiscal year 44 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 45 laws of 2025 (26955) .......... [7,344,000] 9,180,000 46 For services and expenses of the medical 47 assistance program including noninstitu- 48 tional and other spending. 49 The money hereby appropriated is available 50 for payment of liabilities heretofore 51 accrued or hereafter accrued. 52 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 53 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 54 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 55 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 56 reappropriation for this item covering S. 10166 25 1 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 2 ation for this item covering fiscal year 3 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 4 laws of 2025 (26956) ........ [719,220,000] 899,025,000 5 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 6 of law, subject to the approval of the 7 director of the budget, upon submission of 8 an allocation adjustment from the commis- 9 sioner of health, the amount appropriated 10 herein, together with any available feder- 11 al matching funds, may be transferred or 12 suballocated to the office of mental 13 health, office of addiction services and 14 supports, office for people with develop- 15 mental disabilities, division of housing 16 and community renewal, New York state 17 housing trust fund corporation, and office 18 of temporary and disability assistance for 19 services and expenses related to providing 20 affordable housing. Any such spending 21 shall consider the geographical location 22 of the grants. 23 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 24 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 25 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 26 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 27 reappropriation for this item covering 28 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 29 ation for this item covering fiscal year 30 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 31 laws of 2025 (29521) ........ [384,616,000] 480,770,000 32 -------------- 33 § 9. Section 6 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 34 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 108 35 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 36 § 6. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 37 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 38 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 39 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 40 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 41 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR 42 AID TO LOCALITIES 43 UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFIT PROGRAM ... [1,020,000,000] 1,215,000,000 44 -------------- 45 Enterprise Funds 46 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Fund 47 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Account - 50650 48 For payment of unemployment insurance bene- 49 fits pursuant to article 18 of the labor 50 law or as authorized by the federal S. 10166 26 1 government through the disaster unemploy- 2 ment assistance program, the emergency 3 unemployment compensation program, the 4 extended benefit program, the federal 5 additional compensation program or any 6 other federally funded unemployment bene- 7 fit program (34787) ...... [1,020,000,000] 1,215,000,000 8 -------------- 9 § 10. Section 8 of chapter 100 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 10 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 103 11 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 § 8. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 13 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 14 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 15 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 16 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 17 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 18 AID TO LOCALITIES 19 ADDITIONAL MASS TRANSPORTATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ........... 42,536,150 20 -------------- 21 General Fund 22 Local Assistance Account - 10000 23 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 24 of law, the following appropriations are 25 for the payment of mass transportation 26 operating assistance provided that 27 payments from this appropriation shall be 28 made pursuant to a financial plan approved 29 by the director of the budget. 30 To the Capital District transportation 31 authority for the operating expenses ther- 32 eof (53206) .................................. 9,590,650 33 To the Central New York regional transporta- 34 tion authority for the operating expenses 35 thereof (53207) .............................. 6,906,575 36 To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor- 37 tation authority for the operating 38 expenses thereof (53208) ..................... 8,229,375 39 To the Niagara Frontier transportation 40 authority for the operating expenses ther- 41 eof (53209) .................................. 9,876,025 42 To all other public transportation systems 43 serving primarily outside of the metropol- 44 itan commuter transportation district 45 eligible to receive operating assistance 46 under the provisions of section 18-b of 47 the transportation law for the operating 48 expenses thereof in accordance with a 49 service and usage formula to be estab- 50 lished by the commissioner of transporta- 51 tion with the approval of the director of 52 the budget (53210) ........................... 7,178,100 S. 10166 27 1 To Rockland county for the expenses thereof, 2 incurred for public transportation 3 services within the county provided 4 directly or under contract (53211) ............... 8,375 5 To the city of New York for the operating 6 expenses of the Staten Island ferry 7 notwithstanding any other provision of law 8 (53212) ......................................... 81,725 9 To the county of Westchester for the operat- 10 ing expenses thereof incurred for the 11 public transportation services, provided 12 within the county directly or under 13 contract (53213) ............................... 137,175 14 To the county of Nassau or its sub-grantees 15 for the operating expenses thereof 16 incurred for public transportation 17 services (53214) ............................... 165,925 18 To the county of Suffolk for operating 19 expenses thereof incurred for public 20 transportation services, provided within 21 the county directly or under contract 22 (53215) ......................................... 64,550 23 To the city of New York for the operating 24 expenses thereof incurred for public 25 transportation services, provided within 26 the city directly or under contract 27 (53216) ........................................ 218,425 28 To all other public transportation systems 29 serving primarily within the metropolitan 30 commuter transportation district eligible 31 to receive operating assistance under the 32 provisions of section 18-b of the trans- 33 portation law for the operating expenses 34 thereof in accordance with a service and 35 usage formula to be established by the 36 commissioner of transportation with the 37 approval of the director of the budget 38 (53217) ......................................... 79,250 39 -------------- 40 DEDICATED MASS TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND PROGRAM ......... 41 ............................................ [48,325,000] 61,360,250 42 -------------- 43 Special Revenue Funds - Other 44 Dedicated Mass Transportation Trust Fund 45 Non-MTA Capital Account - 20853 46 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 47 of law, the following appropriations are 48 for payment of mass transportation operat- 49 ing assistance for public transportation 50 systems eligible to receive operating 51 assistance under the provisions of section 52 18-b of the transportation law, provided 53 that payments from this appropriation S. 10166 28 1 shall be made pursuant to a financial plan 2 approved by the director of the budget. 3 To the Capital District transportation 4 authority for the operating expenses ther- 5 eof (54253) .................................. 2,585,875 6 To the Central New York regional transporta- 7 tion authority for the operating expenses 8 thereof (54251) .............................. 2,304,275 9 To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor- 10 tation authority for the operating 11 expenses thereof (54252) ..................... 2,582,850 12 To the Niagara Frontier regional transporta- 13 tion authority for the operating expenses 14 thereof (54254) .............................. 3,364,300 15 To all other public transportation bus 16 systems serving primarily areas outside of 17 the metropolitan transportation commuter 18 district eligible to receive operating 19 assistance under the provisions of section 20 18-b of the transportation law for the 21 operating expenses thereof in accordance 22 with the service and usage formula to be 23 established by the commissioner of trans- 24 portation with the approval of the direc- 25 tor of the budget (54250) .................... 2,197,950 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Dedicated Mass Transportation Trust Fund 29 Railroad Account - 20852 30 To the metropolitan transportation authority 31 for deposit in the metropolitan transpor- 32 tation authority dedicated tax fund for 33 the expenses of the New York city transit 34 authority, the Manhattan and Bronx surface 35 transit operating authority, and the 36 Staten Island rapid transit operating 37 authority, the Long Island rail road 38 company and the Metro-North commuter rail- 39 road company which includes the New York 40 state portion of the Harlem, Hudson, Port 41 Jervis, Pascack, and the New Haven commu- 42 ter railroad service regardless of whether 43 the services are provided directly or 44 pursuant to joint service agreements. No 45 expenditure shall be made hereunder until 46 a certificate of approval has been issued 47 by the director of the budget and a copy 48 of such certificate filed with the state 49 comptroller, the chairperson of the senate 50 finance committee and the chairperson of 51 the assembly ways and means committee. 52 Moneys appropriated herein may be made 53 available at such times and upon such 54 conditions as may be deemed appropriate by S. 10166 29 1 the commissioner of transportation and the 2 director of the budget in accordance with 3 the following: 4 To the metropolitan transportation authority 5 for the operating expenses of the Long 6 Island rail road company and the Metro- 7 North commuter railroad company which 8 include operating expenses for the New 9 York state portion of Harlem, Hudson, Port 10 Jervis, Pascack, and New Haven commuter 11 railroad services regardless of whether 12 such services are provided directly or 13 pursuant to joint service agreements 14 (54282) ...................................... 7,260,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Dedicated Mass Transportation Trust Fund 18 Transit Authorities Account - 20851 19 To the metropolitan transportation authority 20 for deposit in the metropolitan transpor- 21 tation authority dedicated tax fund for 22 the expenses of the New York city transit 23 authority, the Manhattan and Bronx surface 24 transit operating authority, and the 25 Staten Island rapid transit operating 26 authority, the Long Island rail road 27 company and the Metro-North commuter rail- 28 road company which includes the New York 29 state portion of the Harlem, Hudson, Port 30 Jervis, Pascack, and the New Haven commu- 31 ter railroad service regardless of whether 32 the services are provided directly or 33 pursuant to joint service agreements. No 34 expenditure shall be made hereunder until 35 a certificate of approval has been issued 36 by the director of the budget and a copy 37 of such certificate filed with the state 38 comptroller, the chairperson of the senate 39 finance committee and the chairperson of 40 the assembly ways and means committee. 41 Moneys appropriated herein may be made 42 available at such times and upon such 43 conditions as may be deemed appropriate by 44 the commissioner of transportation and the 45 director of the budget in accordance with 46 the following: 47 To the metropolitan transportation authority 48 for the operating expenses of the New York 49 city transit authority, the Manhattan and 50 Bronx surface transit operating authority, 51 and the Staten Island rapid transit oper- 52 ating authority (53173) ..................... 41,065,000 53 -------------- S. 10166 30 1 MASS TRANSPORTATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ....................... 6,312,750 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 Local Assistance Account - 10000 5 For payment to the metropolitan transporta- 6 tion authority for the costs of the 7 student fare for school children program 8 for the 2026-27 school year provided 9 however, that the program shall maintain 10 the same eligibility criteria and discount 11 structure for students as was provided 12 during the 2019-20 school year. No expend- 13 iture shall be made hereunder until a 14 certificate of approval has been issued by 15 the director of the budget and a copy of 16 such certificate filed with the state 17 comptroller, the chairperson of the senate 18 finance committee and the chairperson of 19 the assembly ways and means committee. 20 Moneys appropriated herein may only be 21 made available prior to the beginning of 22 each school year semester designated fall, 23 spring, and summer after the receipt of 24 student fare passes by the New York City 25 department of education from the metropol- 26 itan transportation authority (53175) ........ 6,312,750 27 -------------- 28 MASS TRANSPORTATION OPERATING ASSISTANCE FUND PROGRAM ...... 167,533,375 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund 32 Metropolitan Mass Transportation Operating Assistance 33 Account - 21402 34 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 35 of law, the following appropriations are 36 for payment of mass transportation operat- 37 ing assistance provided that payments from 38 this appropriation shall be made pursuant 39 to a financial plan approved by the direc- 40 tor of the budget. 41 To Rockland county for the expenses thereof 42 incurred for public transportation 43 services within the county, provided 44 directly or under contract (53178) ........... 1,591,325 45 To the city of New York for the operating 46 expenses of the Staten Island ferry 47 notwithstanding any other provisions of 48 law (53179) ................................. 14,831,275 49 To the county of Westchester for the operat- 50 ing expenses thereof incurred for public 51 transportation services, provided within S. 10166 31 1 the county directly or under contract 2 (53180) ..................................... 25,355,925 3 To the county of Nassau or its sub-grantees 4 for the operating expenses thereof 5 incurred for public transportation 6 services (53181) ............................ 30,880,275 7 To the county of Suffolk for operating 8 expenses thereof incurred for public 9 transportation services, provided within 10 the county directly or under contract 11 (53182) ..................................... 12,027,150 12 To the city of New York for the operating 13 expenses thereof incurred for public 14 transportation services, provided within 15 the city directly or under contract; 16 provided however, that $2,000,000 of this 17 appropriation shall be for expenses 18 incurred for the Staten Island express bus 19 service (53183) ............................. 39,794,050 20 To all other public transportation systems 21 serving primarily within the metropolitan 22 commuter transportation district, as 23 defined in section 1262 of the public 24 authorities law, eligible to receive oper- 25 ating assistance under the provisions of 26 section 18-b of the transportation law for 27 the operating expenses thereof in accord- 28 ance with a service and usage formula to 29 be established by the commissioner of 30 transportation with the approval of the 31 director of the budget (53184) .............. 14,542,125 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund 35 Public Transportation Systems Operating Assistance 36 Account - 21401 37 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 38 of law, the following appropriations are 39 for payment of mass transportation operat- 40 ing assistance provided that payments from 41 this appropriation shall be made pursuant 42 to a financial plan approved by the direc- 43 tor of the budget. 44 To the Capital District transportation 45 authority for the operating expenses ther- 46 eof (53185) .................................. 4,623,425 47 To the Central New York regional transporta- 48 tion authority for the operating expenses 49 thereof (53186) .............................. 4,278,125 50 To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor- 51 tation authority for the operating 52 expenses thereof (53187) ..................... 5,339,850 53 To the Niagara Frontier transportation S. 10166 32 1 authority for the operating expenses ther- 2 eof (53188) .................................. 7,986,200 3 To all other public transportation bus 4 systems serving primarily areas outside of 5 the metropolitan commuter transportation 6 district eligible to receive operating 7 assistance under the provisions of section 8 18-b of the transportation law for the 9 operating expenses thereof in accordance 10 with the service and usage formula to be 11 established by the commissioner of trans- 12 portation with the approval of the direc- 13 tor of the budget (53189) .................... 6,283,650 14 -------------- 15 MASS TRANSPORTATION OPERATING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ............ 55,467,475 16 -------------- 17 General Fund 18 Local Assistance Account - 10000 19 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 20 of law, the following appropriations are 21 for the payment of mass transportation 22 operating assistance pursuant to section 23 18-b of the transportation law. 24 To the metropolitan transportation authority 25 for the operating expenses of the New York 26 city transit authority, the Manhattan and 27 Bronx surface transit operating authority, 28 and the Staten Island rapid transit oper- 29 ating authority (53192) ........................ 548,850 30 To the metropolitan transportation authority 31 for the operating expenses of the Long 32 Island rail road company and the Metro- 33 North commuter railroad company which 34 include operating expenses for the New 35 York state portion of Harlem, Hudson, Port 36 Jervis, Pascack, and New Haven commuter 37 railroad services regardless of whether 38 such services are provided directly or 39 pursuant to joint service agreements 40 (53193) ........................................ 916,650 41 To the city of New York for the operating 42 expenses of the Staten Island ferry 43 notwithstanding any other provision of law 44 (53198) ......................................... 77,250 45 To the county of Westchester for the operat- 46 ing expenses thereof incurred for the 47 public transportation services, provided 48 within the county directly or under 49 contract (53199) ................................ 65,275 50 To the county of Nassau or its sub-grantees 51 for the operating expenses thereof 52 incurred for public transportation 53 services (53200) ................................ 52,800 S. 10166 33 1 To the county of Suffolk for operating 2 expenses thereof incurred for public 3 transportation services, provided within 4 the county directly or under contract 5 (53201) ......................................... 18,700 6 To the city of New York for the operating 7 expenses thereof incurred for public 8 transportation services, provided within 9 the city directly or under contract 10 (53202) ........................................ 184,275 11 To all other public transportation systems 12 serving primarily within the metropolitan 13 commuter transportation district eligible 14 to receive operating assistance under the 15 provisions of section 18-b of the trans- 16 portation law for the operating expenses 17 thereof in accordance with a service and 18 usage formula to be established by the 19 commissioner of transportation with the 20 approval of the director of the budget 21 (53203) ......................................... 51,900 22 To the Capital District transportation 23 authority for the operating expenses ther- 24 eof (53194) .................................... 347,325 25 To the Central New York regional transporta- 26 tion authority for the operating expenses 27 thereof (53195) ................................ 548,125 28 To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor- 29 tation authority for the operating 30 expenses thereof (53196) ....................... 685,125 31 To the Niagara Frontier transportation 32 authority for the operating expenses ther- 33 eof (53197) .................................... 713,500 34 To all other public transportation systems 35 serving primarily outside the metropolitan 36 commuter transportation district eligible 37 to receive operating assistance under the 38 provisions of section 18-b of the trans- 39 portation law for the operating expenses 40 thereof in accordance with a service and 41 usage formula to be established by the 42 commissioner of transportation with the 43 approval of the director of the budget 44 (53204) ........................................ 510,175 45 -------------- 46 Special Revenue Funds - Other 47 Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund 48 Metropolitan Mass Transportation Operating Assistance 49 Account - 21402 50 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 51 of law, the following appropriations are 52 for the payment of mass transportation 53 operating assistance pursuant to section S. 10166 34 1 18-b of the transportation law and section 2 88-a of the state finance law. 3 To the metropolitan transportation authority 4 for the operating expenses of the New York 5 city transit authority, the Manhattan and 6 Bronx surface transit operating authority, 7 and the Staten Island rapid transit oper- 8 ating authority (53192) ..................... 39,119,150 9 To the metropolitan transportation authority 10 for the operating expenses of the Long 11 Island rail road company and the Metro- 12 North commuter railroad company which 13 include operating expenses for the New 14 York state portion of Harlem, Hudson, Port 15 Jervis, Pascack, and New Haven commuter 16 railroad services regardless of whether 17 such services are provided directly or 18 pursuant to joint service agreements 19 (53193) ...................................... 6,396,350 20 To the city of New York for the operating 21 expenses of the Staten Island ferry 22 (53198) ........................................ 615,675 23 To the county of Westchester for the operat- 24 ing expenses thereof incurred for public 25 transportation services, provided within 26 the county directly or under contract 27 (53199) ........................................ 635,575 28 To the county of Nassau or its sub-grantees 29 for the operating expenses thereof 30 incurred for public transportation 31 services (53200) ............................... 582,075 32 To the county of Suffolk for operating 33 expenses thereof incurred for public 34 transportation services, provided within 35 the county directly or under contract 36 (53201) ........................................ 212,375 37 To the city of New York for the operating 38 expenses thereof incurred for public 39 transportation services, provided within 40 the city directly or under contract 41 (53202) ...................................... 1,507,775 42 To eligible public transportation systems 43 serving primarily within the metropolitan 44 commuter transportation district, as 45 defined in section 1262 of the public 46 authorities law, eligible to receive oper- 47 ating assistance under the provisions of 48 section 18-b of the transportation law for 49 the operating expenses thereof in accord- 50 ance with a service and usage formula to 51 be established by the commissioner of 52 transportation with the approval of the 53 director of the budget (53203) ................. 454,550 54 -------------- 55 Special Revenue Funds - Other S. 10166 35 1 Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund 2 Public Transportation Systems Operating Assistance 3 Account - 21401 4 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 5 of law, the following appropriations are 6 for the payment of mass transportation 7 operating assistance pursuant to section 8 18-b of the transportation law and section 9 88-a of the state finance law. 10 To the Capital District transportation 11 authority for the operating expenses ther- 12 eof (53194) .................................... 151,525 13 To the Central New York regional transporta- 14 tion authority for the operating expenses 15 thereof (53195) ................................ 255,775 16 To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor- 17 tation authority for the operating 18 expenses thereof (53196) ....................... 292,250 19 To the Niagara Frontier transportation 20 authority for the operating expenses ther- 21 eof (53197) .................................... 311,500 22 To all other public transportation bus 23 systems serving areas outside of the 24 metropolitan commuter transportation 25 district eligible to receive operating 26 assistance under the provisions of section 27 18-b of the transportation law for the 28 operating expenses thereof in accordance 29 with the service and usage formula to be 30 established by the commissioner of trans- 31 portation with the approval of the direc- 32 tor of the budget (54289) ...................... 212,950 33 -------------- 34 METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY SUPPORT PROGRAM ....... 13,138,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Metropolitan Transportation Authority Financial Assist- 38 ance Fund 39 New York Central Business District Trust Fund - 23653 40 To the metropolitan transportation authority 41 pursuant to section 99-ff of the state 42 finance law for deposit in the central 43 business district tolling capital lockbox 44 established pursuant to section 553-j of 45 the public authorities law (54298) .......... 13,138,000 46 -------------- 47 § 11. Section 7 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 48 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 108 49 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 50 § 7. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 51 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby S. 10166 36 1 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 2 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 3 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 4 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE 5 OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES 6 AID TO LOCALITIES 7 COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM .................. [615,555,000] 760,608,000 8 -------------- 9 General Fund 10 Local Assistance Account - 10000 11 For services and expenses of the community 12 services program, net of disallowances, 13 for community programs for people with 14 developmental disabilities pursuant to 15 article 41 of the mental hygiene law, 16 and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974, 17 chapter 660 of the laws of 1977, chapter 18 412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the 19 laws of 1987, chapter 729 of the laws of 20 1989, chapter 329 of the laws of 1993 and 21 other provisions of the mental hygiene 22 law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 23 provision of law, the following appropri- 24 ation shall be net of prior and/or current 25 year refunds, rebates, reimbursements, and 26 credits. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 28 advances and reimbursement made pursuant 29 to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and 30 section 41.18 of the mental hygiene law 31 shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and 32 in a manner prescribed by the agency head 33 and approved by the director of the budg- 34 et. The moneys hereby appropriated are 35 available to reimburse or advance locali- 36 ties and voluntary non-profit agencies for 37 expenditures made during local fiscal 38 periods commencing January 1, 2026, April 39 1, 2026 or July 1, 2026, and for advances 40 for the 3 month period beginning January 41 1, 2027. 42 Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41 43 of the mental hygiene law or any other 44 inconsistent provision of law, rule or 45 regulation, the commissioner, pursuant to 46 such contract and in the manner provided 47 therein, may pay all or a portion of the 48 expenses incurred by such voluntary agen- 49 cies arising out of loans which are funded 50 from the proceeds of bonds and notes S. 10166 37 1 issued by the dormitory authority of the 2 state of New York. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 4 the money hereby appropriated may be 5 transferred to state operations and/or any 6 appropriation of the office for people 7 with developmental disabilities with the 8 approval of the director of the budget. 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 10 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 11 be used for state aid of up to 100 percent 12 of the net deficit costs of day training 13 programs and family support services. 14 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 15 16.23 of the mental hygiene law and any 16 other inconsistent provision of law, with 17 relation to the operation of certified 18 family care homes, including family care 19 homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-pro- 20 fit agencies, moneys from this appropri- 21 ation may be used for payments to purchase 22 general services including but not limited 23 to respite providers, up to a maximum of 24 14 days, at rates to be established by the 25 commissioner and approved by the director 26 of the budget in consideration of factors 27 including, but not limited to, geographic 28 area and number of clients cared for in 29 the home and for payment in an amount 30 determined by the commissioner for the 31 personal needs of each client residing in 32 the family care home. 33 Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivi- 34 sion 12 of section 8 of the state finance 35 law and any other inconsistent provision 36 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 37 be used for expenses of family care homes 38 including payments to operators of certi- 39 fied family care homes for damages caused 40 by clients to personal and real property 41 in accordance with standards established 42 by the commissioner and approved by the 43 director of the budget. 44 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 45 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 46 be used for appropriate day program 47 services and residential services includ- 48 ing, but not limited to, direct housing 49 subsidies to individuals, start-up 50 expenses for family care providers, envi- 51 ronmental modifications, adaptive technol- 52 ogies, appraisals, property options, 53 feasibility studies and preoperational 54 expenses. 55 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 56 of law except pursuant to a chapter of the S. 10166 38 1 laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent 2 targeted inflationary increase, for the 3 period commencing on April 1, 2025 and 4 ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner 5 shall not apply any other inflationary 6 increases, cost of living type increases, 7 inflation factors, or trend factors for 8 the purpose of establishing rates of 9 payments, contracts or any other form of 10 reimbursement; provided that this shall 11 not prevent the commissioner from applying 12 prior adjustments for the purpose of 13 establishing rates resulting from a rebas- 14 ing of base year costs. 15 Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa- 16 tion law and any other provision of law, 17 rule or regulation to the contrary, direct 18 support staff in programs certified or 19 approved by the office for people with 20 developmental disabilities, including the 21 home and community based services waiver 22 programs that the office for people with 23 developmental disabilities is authorized 24 to administer with federal approval pursu- 25 ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of 26 the federal social security act, are 27 authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD 28 may specify when performed under the 29 supervision, training and periodic 30 inspection of a registered professional 31 nurse and in accordance with an authorized 32 practitioner's ordered care. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 34 to the contrary, and consistent with 35 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 36 the directors of facilities licensed but 37 not operated by the office for people with 38 developmental disabilities who act as 39 federally-appointed representative payees 40 and who assume management responsibility 41 over the funds of a resident may continue 42 to use such funds for the cost of the 43 resident's care and treatment, consistent 44 with federal law and regulations. 45 Funds appropriated herein shall be available 46 in accordance with the following: 47 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 48 of law, the director of the budget is 49 authorized to make suballocations from 50 this appropriation to the department of 51 health medical assistance program. 52 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 53 of law, and pursuant to criteria estab- 54 lished by the commissioner of the office 55 for people with developmental disabilities 56 and approved by the director of the budg- S. 10166 39 1 et, expenditures may be made from this 2 appropriation for residential facilities 3 which are pending recertification as 4 intermediate care facilities for people 5 with developmental disabilities. 6 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 7 41.36 of the mental hygiene law and any 8 other inconsistent provision of law, 9 moneys from this appropriation may be used 10 for payment up to $250 per year per 11 client, at such times and in such manner 12 as determined by the commissioner on the 13 basis of financial need for the personal 14 needs of each client residing in voluntar- 15 y-operated community residences and volun- 16 tary-operated community residential alter- 17 natives, including individualized 18 residential alternatives under the home 19 and community based services waiver. The 20 commissioner shall, subject to the 21 approval of the director of the budget, 22 alter existing advance payment schedules 23 for voluntary-operated community resi- 24 dences established pursuant to section 25 41.36 of the mental hygiene law. 26 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 27 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 28 be used for the operation of clinics 29 licensed pursuant to article 16 of the 30 mental hygiene law including, but not 31 limited to, supportive and habilitative 32 services consistent with the home and 33 community based services waiver. 34 For the state and/or local share of medical 35 assistance services expenses incurred by 36 the department of health for the provision 37 of medical assistance services to people 38 with developmental disabilities (37835) .. 39 ............................. [560,016,000] 700,020,000 40 For services and expenses of the community 41 services program, net of disallowances, 42 for community programs for people with 43 developmental disabilities pursuant to 44 article 41 of the mental hygiene law, 45 and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974, 46 chapter 660 of the laws of 1977, chapter 47 412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the 48 laws of 1987, chapter 729 of the laws of 49 1989, chapter 329 of the laws of 1993 and 50 other provisions of the mental hygiene 51 law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 52 provision of law, the following appropri- 53 ation shall be net of prior and/or current 54 year refunds, rebates, reimbursements, and 55 credits. S. 10166 40 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 2 advances and reimbursement made pursuant 3 to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and 4 section 41.18 of the mental hygiene law 5 shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and 6 in a manner prescribed by the agency head 7 and approved by the director of the budg- 8 et. The moneys hereby appropriated are 9 available to reimburse or advance locali- 10 ties and voluntary non-profit agencies for 11 expenditures made during local fiscal 12 periods commencing January 1, 2026, April 13 1, 2026 or July 1, 2026, and for advances 14 for the 3 month period beginning January 15 1, 2027. 16 Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41 17 of the mental hygiene law or any other 18 inconsistent provision of law, rule or 19 regulation, the commissioner, pursuant to 20 such contract and in the manner provided 21 therein, may pay all or a portion of the 22 expenses incurred by such voluntary agen- 23 cies arising out of loans which are funded 24 from the proceeds of bonds and notes 25 issued by the dormitory authority of the 26 state of New York. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 28 the money hereby appropriated may be 29 transferred to state operations and/or any 30 appropriation of the office for people 31 with developmental disabilities with the 32 approval of the director of the budget. 33 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 34 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 35 be used for state aid of up to 100 percent 36 of the net deficit costs of day training 37 programs and family support services. 38 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 39 16.23 of the mental hygiene law and any 40 other inconsistent provision of law, with 41 relation to the operation of certified 42 family care homes, including family care 43 homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-pro- 44 fit agencies, moneys from this appropri- 45 ation may be used for payments to purchase 46 general services including but not limited 47 to respite providers, up to a maximum of 48 14 days, at rates to be established by the 49 commissioner and approved by the director 50 of the budget in consideration of factors 51 including, but not limited to, geographic 52 area and number of clients cared for in 53 the home and for payment in an amount 54 determined by the commissioner for the 55 personal needs of each client residing in 56 the family care home. S. 10166 41 1 Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivi- 2 sion 12 of section 8 of the state finance 3 law and any other inconsistent provision 4 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 5 be used for expenses of family care homes 6 including payments to operators of certi- 7 fied family care homes for damages caused 8 by clients to personal and real property 9 in accordance with standards established 10 by the commissioner and approved by the 11 director of the budget. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 13 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 14 be used for appropriate day program 15 services and residential services includ- 16 ing, but not limited to, direct housing 17 subsidies to individuals, start-up 18 expenses for family care providers, envi- 19 ronmental modifications, adaptive technol- 20 ogies, appraisals, property options, 21 feasibility studies and preoperational 22 expenses. 23 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 24 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 25 be used to fund continuity of care 26 services, family reimbursed respite, other 27 than personal services and direct housing 28 subsidies for people who are enrolled in 29 OPWDD's self-direction program, provided 30 any or all such costs are identified in a 31 self-direction budget approved by OPWDD. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 33 of law except pursuant to a chapter of the 34 laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent 35 targeted inflationary increase, for the 36 period commencing on April 1, 2025 and 37 ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner 38 shall not apply any other inflationary 39 increases, cost of living type increases, 40 inflation factors, or trend factors for 41 the purpose of establishing rates of 42 payments, contracts or any other form of 43 reimbursement; provided that this shall 44 not prevent the commissioner from applying 45 prior adjustments for the purpose of 46 establishing rates resulting from a rebas- 47 ing of base year costs. 48 Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa- 49 tion law and any other provision of law, 50 rule or regulation to the contrary, direct 51 support staff in programs certified or 52 approved by the office for people with 53 developmental disabilities, including the 54 home and community based services waiver 55 programs that the office for people with 56 developmental disabilities is authorized S. 10166 42 1 to administer with federal approval pursu- 2 ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of 3 the federal social security act, are 4 authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD 5 may specify when performed under the 6 supervision, training and periodic 7 inspection of a registered professional 8 nurse and in accordance with an authorized 9 practitioner's ordered care. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 11 to the contrary, and consistent with 12 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 13 the directors of facilities licensed but 14 not operated by the office for people with 15 developmental disabilities who act as 16 federally-appointed representative payees 17 and who assume management responsibility 18 over the funds of a resident may continue 19 to use such funds for the cost of the 20 resident's care and treatment, consistent 21 with federal law and regulations. 22 Funds appropriated herein shall be available 23 in accordance with the following: 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 25 to the contrary, funds appropriated herein 26 are available to reimburse in- and 27 out-of-state private residential schools, 28 pursuant to subdivision (c) of section 29 13.37-a and subdivision (g) of section 30 13.38 of the mental hygiene law, for costs 31 of supporting the residential and day 32 program services available to individuals 33 who are over the age of 21 years of age, 34 provided that the amount paid for residen- 35 tial services and/or maintenance costs is 36 net of any supplemental security income 37 benefit to which the individual receiving 38 services is eligible, and provided further 39 that funding for nonresidential services 40 will be in an amount not to exceed the 41 maximum reimbursement for appropriate day 42 services delivered by the office for 43 people with developmental disabilities 44 certified or approved providers other than 45 in- and out-of-state private residential 46 schools, unless otherwise authorized by 47 the director of the budget. 48 Notwithstanding section 163 of the state 49 finance law, section 142 of the economic 50 development law, and article 41 of the 51 mental hygiene law, the commissioner of 52 the office for people with developmental 53 disabilities may make the funds appropri- 54 ated herein available as state aid, a loan 55 or a grant, pursuant to terms and condi- 56 tions established by the commissioner of S. 10166 43 1 the office for people with developmental 2 disabilities, to cover a portion of the 3 development costs of private, public 4 and/or non-profit organizations, including 5 corporations and partnerships established 6 pursuant to the private housing finance 7 law and/or any other statutory provisions, 8 for supportive housing units that have 9 been set aside for individuals with intel- 10 lectual and developmental disabilities. 11 Further, the office for people with devel- 12 opmental disabilities shall have a lien on 13 the real property developed with such 14 state aid, loans or grants, which shall be 15 in the amount of the loan or grant, for a 16 maximum term of 30 years, or other longer 17 term consistent with the requirements of 18 another regulatory agency. 19 For services and expenses related to the 20 provision of residential services to 21 people with developmental disabilities 22 (37802) ...................... [32,241,000] 35,172,000 23 For services and expenses related to the 24 provision of day program services to 25 people with developmental disabilities 26 (37803) ....................... [7,920,000] 8,640,000 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 provision of family support services to 29 people with developmental disabilities 30 (37804) ....................... [8,910,000] 9,720,000 31 For services and expenses related to the 32 provision of workshop, day training and 33 employment services to people with devel- 34 opmental disabilities. Notwithstanding any 35 other provision of law, up to [$75,900] 36 $82,800 of this appropriation may be 37 transferred to the New York State Educa- 38 tion Departments' Adult Career and Contin- 39 uing Education Services - Vocational Reha- 40 bilitation (ACCES-VR) program to support 41 the LongTerm Sheltered Employment program 42 operated by FEDCAP Rehabilitation 43 Services, Inc. (37805) ....... [5,148,000] 5,616,000 44 For other services and expenses provided to 45 people with developmental disabilities 46 including but not limited to hepatitis B, 47 care at home waiver, epilepsy services, 48 Special Olympics New York, Inc. and volun- 49 tary fingerprinting (37806) ... [1,320,000] 1,440,000 50 -------------- 51 § 12. Section 8 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 52 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 108 53 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 54 § 8. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 55 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby S. 10166 44 1 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 2 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 3 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 4 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES 5 AID TO LOCALITIES 6 BLIND VETERAN ANNUITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ....................... 385,000 7 -------------- 8 General Fund 9 Local Assistance Account - 10000 10 For payment of annuities to blind veterans 11 and eligible surviving spouses. Up to 12 $15,000 of this appropriation may be 13 transferred to state operations for admin- 14 istrative costs associated with this 15 program (54606) ................................ 385,000 16 -------------- 17 VETERANS' BENEFITS ADVISING PROGRAM ............. [198,000] 216,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other 20 Homeless Veterans Assistance Fund 21 Homeless Veterans Assistance Account - 20204 22 For services and expenses related to home- 23 less veterans' housing (54815) .. [198,000] 216,000 24 -------------- 25 § 13. No expenditure may be made from any appropriation in this act, 26 until a certificate of approval has been issued by the director of the 27 budget and a copy of such certificate shall have been filed with the 28 state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance committee and the 29 chairman of the assembly ways and means committee provided, however, 30 that any expenditures from any appropriation in this act made by the 31 legislature or judiciary shall not require such certificate. 32 § 14. All expenditures and disbursements made against the appropri- 33 ations in this act shall, upon final action by the legislature on appro- 34 priation bills submitted by the governor pursuant to article VII of the 35 state constitution for the support of government for the state fiscal 36 year beginning April 1, 2026, be transferred by the comptroller as 37 expenditures and disbursements to such appropriations for all state 38 departments and agencies, as applicable, in amounts equal to the amounts 39 charged against the appropriations in this act for each such department, 40 agency, and the legislature and the judiciary. 41 § 15. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdi- 42 vision, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 43 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 44 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 45 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section S. 10166 45 1 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 2 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 3 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 4 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 5 § 16. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 6 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2026; provided, 7 however, that upon the transfer of expenditures and disbursements by the 8 comptroller as provided in section fourteen of this act, the appropri- 9 ations made by this act and subject to such section shall be deemed 10 repealed.